prince/dictionaries/lt.aff
SFX Q čias    tesniu          čias      
SFX Q čias    tesniame        čias      
SFX Q čias    tesni           čias      
SFX Q čias    tesnių          čias      
SFX Q čias    tesniems        čias      
SFX Q čias    tesnius         čias      
SFX Q čias    tesniais        čias      
SFX Q čias    tesniuose       čias      
SFX Q čias    tesnė           čias      
SFX Q čias    tesnės          čias      
SFX Q čias    tesnei          čias      
SFX Q čias    tesnę           čias      
SFX Q čias    tesne           čias      
SFX Q čias    tesnėje         čias      
SFX Q čias    tesnėms         čias      
SFX Q čias    tesnes          čias      
SFX Q čias    tesnėmis        čias      
SFX Q čias    tesnėse         čias      
SFX Q čias    tesnysis        čias      
SFX Q čias    tesniojo        čias      
SFX Q čias    tesniajam       čias      
SFX Q čias    tesnįjį         čias      
SFX Q čias    tesniuoju       čias      
SFX Q čias    tesniajame      čias      
SFX Q čias    tesnieji        čias      
SFX Q čias    tesniųjų        čias      
SFX Q čias    tesniesiems     čias      
SFX Q čias    tesniuosius     čias      
SFX Q čias    tesniaisiais    čias      
SFX Q čias    tesniuosiuose   čias      
SFX Q čias    tesnioji        čias      
SFX Q čias    tesniosios      čias      
SFX Q čias    tesniajai       čias      
SFX Q čias    tesniąją        čias      
SFX Q čias    tesniąja        čias      
SFX Q čias    tesniojoj       čias      
SFX Q čias    tesniojoje      čias      
SFX Q čias    tesniosioms     čias      
SFX Q čias    tesniąsias      čias      
SFX Q čias    tesniosiomis    čias      
SFX Q čias    tesniosiose     čias      
SFX Q džias   desnis          džias     
SFX Q džias   desnio          džias     
SFX Q džias   desniam         džias     
SFX Q džias   desnį           džias     
SFX Q džias   desniu          džias     
SFX Q džias   desniame        džias     
SFX Q džias   desni           džias     
SFX Q džias   desnių          džias     
SFX Q džias   desniems        džias     
SFX Q džias   desnius         džias     
SFX Q džias   desniais        džias     
SFX Q džias   desniuose       džias     
SFX Q džias   desnė           džias     
SFX Q džias   desnės          džias     
SFX Q džias   desnei          džias     
SFX Q džias   desnę           džias     
SFX Q džias   desne           džias     
SFX Q džias   desnėje         džias     
SFX Q džias   desnėms         džias     
SFX Q džias   desnes          džias     
SFX Q džias   desnėmis        džias     
SFX Q džias   desnėse         džias     
SFX Q džias   desnysis        džias     
SFX Q džias   desniojo        džias     
SFX Q džias   desniajam       džias     
SFX Q džias   desnįjį         džias     
SFX Q džias   desniuoju       džias     
SFX Q džias   desniajame      džias     
SFX Q džias   desnieji        džias     
SFX Q džias   desniųjų        džias     
SFX Q džias   desniesiems     džias     
SFX Q džias   desniuosius     džias     
SFX Q džias   desniaisiais    džias     
SFX Q džias   desniuosiuose   džias     
SFX Q džias   desnioji        džias     
SFX Q džias   desniosios      džias     
SFX Q džias   desniajai       džias     
SFX Q džias   desniąją        džias     
SFX Q džias   desniąja        džias     
SFX Q džias   desniojoj       džias     
SFX Q džias   desniojoje      džias     
SFX Q džias   desniosioms     džias     
SFX Q džias   desniąsias      džias     
SFX Q džias   desniosiomis    džias     
SFX Q džias   desniosiose     džias     
SFX Q us      esnis           us        
SFX Q us      esnio           us        
SFX Q us      esniam          us        
SFX Q us      esnį            us        
SFX Q us      esniu           us        
SFX Q us      esniame         us        
SFX Q us      esni            us        
SFX Q us      esnių           us        
SFX Q us      esniems         us        
SFX Q us      esnius          us        
SFX Q us      esniais         us        
SFX Q us      esniuose        us        
SFX Q us      esnė            us        
SFX Q us      esnės           us        
SFX Q us      esnei           us        
SFX Q us      esnę            us        
SFX Q us      esne            us        
SFX Q us      esnioje         us        
SFX Q us      esnėms          us        
SFX Q us      esnes           us        
SFX Q us      esnėmis         us        
SFX Q us      esnėse          us        
SFX Q us      esnysis         us        
SFX Q us      esniojo         us        
SFX Q us      esniajam        us        
SFX Q us      esnįjį          us        
SFX Q us      esniuoju        us        
SFX Q us      esniajame       us        
SFX Q us      esnieji         us        
SFX Q us      esniųjų         us        
SFX Q us      esniesiems      us        
SFX Q us      esniuosius      us        
SFX Q us      esniaisiais     us        
SFX Q us      esniuosiuose    us        
SFX Q us      esnioji         us        
SFX Q us      esniosios       us        
SFX Q us      esniajai        us        
SFX Q us      esniąją         us        
SFX Q us      esniąja         us        
SFX Q us      esniojoj        us        
SFX Q us      esniojoje       us        
SFX Q us      esniosioms      us        
SFX Q us      esniąsias       us        
SFX Q us      esniosiomis     us        
SFX Q us      esniosiose      us        
SFX Q is      iausio          [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiam         [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausį           [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiu          [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiame        [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausi           [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausių          [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiems        [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausius         [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiais        [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiuose       [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausia          [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausios         [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiai         [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausią          [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausioje        [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausioms        [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausias         [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiomis       [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiose        [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiasis       [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiojo        [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiajam       [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiąjį        [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiuoju       [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiajame      [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausieji        [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiųjų        [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiesiems     [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiuosius     [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiaisiais    [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiuosiuose   [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausioji        [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiosios      [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiajai       [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiąją        [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiąja        [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiojoj       [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiojoje      [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiosioms     [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiąsias      [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiosiomis    [^dtj]is  
SFX Q is      iausiosiose     [^dtj]is  
SFX Q ys      iausio          [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiam         [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausį           [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiu          [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiame        [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausi           [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausių          [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiems        [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausius         [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiais        [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiuose       [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausia          [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausios         [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiai         [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausią          [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausioje        [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausioms        [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausias         [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiomis       [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiose        [^dtj]ys  
SFX Q ys      iausiasis       [^dtj]ys  
