prince/dictionaries/lt.dic
absoliutus/AQN
blogas/AQN
būdingas/AQN
čigoniškas/AQN
dainingas/AQN
darnus/AQN
debesuotas/AQN
deklaratyvus/AQN
dėsningas/AQN
didis/AQN
dinamiškas/AQ
diskretus/AQN
dramatiškas/AQN
draugiškas/AQN
džiugus/AQN
egzotiškas/AQN
ekspresyvus/AQN
ekstravagantiškas/AQN
ekvivalentus/AQN
elementarus/AQN
erdvus/ANQ
europietiškas/AQ
fanatiškas/AQN
fiktyvus/AQN
formalus/AQN
funkcionalus/AQN
gailus/AQN
galingas/AQN
garbus/AQN
garsus/AQN
gausus/AQN
geltonas/AQ
geografiškas/AQN
geraširdiškas/AQN
gilus/AQN
gyvas/AQN
gyvybiškas/AQN
glaustas/AQ
globalus/AQN
grafiškas/AQ
gražus/AQN
grėsmingas/AQN
grynas/AQN
gūdus/AQ
horizontalus/AQN
įdėmus/AQN
įkypas/AQN
įmantrus/AQN
informatyvus/AQN
įnoringas/AQN
inteligentiškas/AQN
interaktyvus/AQN
intuityvus/ANQ
ironiškas/AQN
išoriškas/AQN
įspūdingas/AQN
išsamus/AQN
ištvermingas/AQN
iteratyvus/AQ
įžymus/AQN
įžvalgus/ANQ
japoniškas/AQ
jaunas/AQN
judrus/AQN
juokingas/AQN
kanceliarinis/AQ
karštas/AQN
keistas/AQN
kiauliškas/AQ
kiekybiškas/AQN
kinietiškas/AQ
klaidingas/AQN
kokybiškas/AQN
konkretus/AQN
konstruktyvus/ANQ
kraupus/AQN
krikščioniškas/AQN
kroatiškas/AQ
kūdas/AQN
kultūringas/AQN
kupinas/AQN
kvailas/AQN
laikinas/AQ
laisvas/AQN
lankstus/AQN
lemtingas/AQN
lenkiškas/AQ
liesas/AQN
lietuviškas/AQN
lipnus/AQN
lygiagretus/AQN
logiškas/AQN
magiškas/AQN
malonus/AQN
margas/ANQ
materialus/AQN
mažas/AQN
mėgiamas/AQN
mėlynas/AQ
mielas/AQN
minimalus/AQ
mišrus/AQN
mobilus/AQN
monotoniškas/AQN
moteriškas/AQN
musulmoniškas/AQN
naudingas/AQN
nebylus/AQ
neigiamas/AQN
neurotiškas/AQN
neutralus/AQ
niūrus/AQN
normalus/AQN
novatoriškas/AQ
nuodingas/AQN
nuolankus/ANQ
nuoširdus/AQN
nuostolingas/ANQ
oficialus/AQN
optimistiškas/AQN
originalus/AQN
pagarbus/AQN
pajėgus/AQN
palaidas/AQN
palankus/AQN
paprastas/AQN
paslaptingas/AQN
pastovus/AQN
patrauklus/AQN
paviršutiniškas/AQN
pažangus/AQN
pelningas/AQN
periodiškas/AQN
pėsčias/AQN
pikantiškas/AQN
pilkas/AQ
pirmas/AQN
plikas/AQN
plokščias/AQN
populiarus/AQN
potencialus/AQN
praktiškas/AQN
priešingas/AQ
prieštaringas/AQN
priklausomas/AQN
principingas/AQN
privatus/AQ
produktyvus/AQN
protingas/AQN
puošnus/AQN
purvinas/AQN
radikalus/AQN
raišas/AQ
raudonas/AQ
realus/AQN
reikalingas/AQN
rekordiškas/AQ
religingas/AQN
retas/AQN
riebus/AQN
ritmingas/AQN
ryškus/AQN
romėniškas/ANQ
rūgštus/AQN
rūpestingas/AQN
šabloniškas/AQN
saldus/AQN
šaltas/AQN
saugus/AQN
savarankiškas/AQN
savotiškas/AQ
seklus/AQN
seksualus/ANQ
senoviškas/AQN
siauras/AQ
silpnas/AQN
simpatiškas/AQN
sistematiškas/AQN
skaidrus/AQN
skanus/AQN
skaudus/AQN
skirtingas/AQN
skolingas/AQN
skubus/AQN
šlapias/AQN
slidus/AQN
slovėniškas/AQ
šmaikštus/AQN
smarkus/AQN
snobiškas/AQN
sodrus/AQN
spalvotas/AQN
specialus/AQN
stabilus/AQN
stacionarus/AQN
stambus/AQN
stebuklingas/AQN
storas/AQN
subjektyvus/ANQ
suderinamas/AQN
sunkus/AQN
švarus/AQN
švelnus/AQN
svetimas/AQN
švietėjiškas/AQN
taisyklingas/AQN
tamsus/AQN
techniškas/AQ
teisėtas/AQN
teisiškas/ANQ
teoriškas/AQN
tiesus/AQN
tikroviškas/AQN
tikslus/AQN
tinkamas/AQN
tipizuotas/AQN
tylus/AQN
tolerantiškas/AQN
tolydus/AQN
tolus/AQN
trapus/AQN
trivialus/AQN
turtingas/AQN
tvarkingas/AQN
unikalus/AQN
uždaras/AQN
vaizdus/AQN
veiksmingas/AQN
vėlyvas/AQN
vėlus/AQN
vertas/AQN
vertingas/AQN
vidutiniškas/AQN
vienareikšmiškas/AQN
vienišas/AQN
vientisas/AQN
vikrus/AQN
visapusiškas/AQN
visuotinis/AQN
vyresnis/AQ
vyriškas/AQN
žalingas/AQN
žemas/AQN
žiemiškas/AQN
žymus/AQN
žmoniškas/AQN
žvarbus/AQN
